incubator/apertium-hi-ur.hi.dix
    <pardef n="रेडिओ/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गेह्/ऊँ__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊँ</l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊँ</l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊँ</l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उँओं</l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भाषाविद्/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>ऊँ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="क्/आ__स्ह्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="अहम्"><i>अहम्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्चिष्मान्"><i>अर्चिष्मान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="असत्"><i>असत्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अवाक्"><i>अवाक्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अविद्वान्"><i>अविद्वान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अयस्"><i>अयस्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="भगवान्"><i>भगवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="भाग्यवान्"><i>भाग्यवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बलवान्"><i>बलवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बलात्"><i>बलात्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बणिक्"><i>बणिक्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बानो"><i>बानो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="भाषाविद्"><i>भाषाविद्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="भोगवान्"><i>भोगवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बृहत्"><i>बृहत्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बृहद्"><i>बृहद्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="ब्रह्मपरिषद्"><i>ब्रह्मपरिषद्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बुद्धिमान्"><i>बुद्धिमान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="छः"><i>छः</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="डिपो"><i>डिपो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="गेहूँ"><i>गेह्</i><par n="गेह्/ऊँ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="गो"><i>गो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="हीरो"><i>हीरो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="जगत्"><i>जगत्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="खडाऊँ"><i>खडा</i><par n="गेह्/ऊँ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="का"><i>क्</i><par n="क्/आ__स्ह्"/></e>
    <e lm="किंचित्"><i>किंचित्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="कोको"><i>कोको</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="लक्ष्मीवान्"><i>लक्ष्मीवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="लीलावान्"><i>लीलावान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="लिंगवान्"><i>लिंगवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="महतो"><i>महतो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="महाधनुष्"><i>महाधनुष्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="महिमावान्"><i>महिमावान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="माल्यवान्"><i>माल्यवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="मंत्रविद्"><i>मंत्रविद्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="मर्मविद्"><i>मर्मविद्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="मातृ"><i>मातृ</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="मायावान्"><i>मायावान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="मेधावान्"><i>मेधावान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="नीग्रो"><i>नीग्रो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="फलवान्"><i>फलवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="परिषद्"><i>परिषद्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="पो"><i>पो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="फोटो"><i>फोटो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="पोतवणिक्"><i>पोतवणिक्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="पृथक्"><i>पृथक्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रभावान्"><i>प्रभावान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रभाववान्"><i>प्रभाववान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्राच्यविद्"><i>प्राच्यविद्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रज्ञावान्"><i>प्रज्ञावान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रमादवान्"><i>प्रमादवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्राणवान्"><i>प्राणवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिबंधवान्"><i>प्रतिबंधवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिभावान्"><i>प्रतिभावान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिष्ठावान्"><i>प्रतिष्ठावान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रयत्नवान्"><i>प्रयत्नवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रयोजनवान्"><i>प्रयोजनवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रेक्षावान्"><i>प्रेक्षावान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="ऋ"><i>ऋ</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="रामधनुष्"><i>रामधनुष्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="रसवान्"><i>रसवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="रासो"><i>रासो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="रथवान्"><i>रथवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="रेडिओ"><i>रेडिओ</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="रेडियो"><i>रेडियो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सभासद्"><i>सभासद्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सा"><i>स्</i><par n="क्/आ__स्ह्"/></e>
    <e lm="शक्रजित्"><i>शक्रजित्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="संस्कारवान्"><i>संस्कारवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="संवत्"><i>संवत्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सन्"><i>सन्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सत्"><i>सत्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सद्"><i>सद्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="शिखावान्"><i>शिखावान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="शिक्षाविद्"><i>शिक्षाविद्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="शो"><i>शो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="शृंगवान्"><i>शृंगवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="श्रद्धावान्"><i>श्रद्धावान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="स्टूडियो"><i>स्टूडियो</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="विचारवान्"><i>विचारवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="विजितवान्"><i>विजितवान्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="विराट्"><i>विराट्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="विद्"><i>विद्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="विद्युत्"><i>विद्युत्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="वृहत्"><i>वृहत्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="तमस्"><i>तमस्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="तत्"><i>तत्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="दंडवत्"><i>दंडवत्</i><par n="भाषाविद्/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="यूनेस्को"><i>यूनेस्को</i><par n="रेडिओ/__न्"/></e>
